Mississippi, session 2026, HB1484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Fatherhood Engagement in Maternal Health Act." SECTION 2.  Declaration of purpose.  The Legislature finds and declares as follows: (a)  Fatherhood engagement can play an important role in improving maternal health care, addressing maternal mortality and morbidity and bettering the development and long-term growth of a child. (b)  The participation of the father during prenatal care appointments can provide the mother with additional support to recognize potential pregnancy-related complications that could lead to maternal mortality and morbidity. (c)  Fatherhood engagement can reduce the risks of postpartum mood and anxiety disorders and contributes to a lower likelihood of a preterm birth and a higher likelihood of a healthier birth weight. (d)  Active support of the father during breastfeeding can increase the chances of successful breastfeeding, which improves the physical and mental health of the baby and the mother. (e)  Physical contact between the father and the baby just after birth and in the months following birth has been shown to improve the health and development of the baby, improve the mental health of the father and foster father-child bonding in the short term and long term. SECTION 3.  Public awareness campaign on fatherhood engagement in maternal health.  (1)  Duties. Subject to funding being available, no later than two (2) years after the effective date of this act, the State Department of Health shall conduct a public awareness campaign to increase the understanding of fatherhood engagement in improving overall health outcomes during pregnancy, childbirth and postpartum for both the mother and baby. (2)  Contents.  The department shall ensure that the public awareness campaign under subsection (1) of this section includes the following: (a)  Messaging intended to provide information to the public about the importance of a father's role in pregnancy and parenting. (b)  Resources and information that promote awareness about the impact of father inclusion on maternal and infant outcomes. SECTION 4.  Guidance to maternal care providers on encouraging fatherhood engagement in maternal health.  (1)  Duties of department.  No later than one (1) year after the effective date of this act, the department shall post materials on the department's publicly accessible Internet website that address how a provider of maternity care, including a hospital, health care facility, birth center, or health care practitioner can provide training and education to a health care practitioner about the benefits of fatherhood engagement in improving overall health outcomes during pregnancy, childbirth and postpartum for both the mother and baby. (2)  Screening for paternal depression.  The department shall encourage and promote the inclusion of paternal depression screening by providers of maternity care as part of care provided during pregnancy, childbirth and postpartum for both the mother and baby. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.